Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.235 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) The Washington local food for schools program is created in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of facilitating increased procurement and distribution of Washington grown foods to school food authorities via the United States department of agriculture foods distribution system of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(b) School food authorities participating in the national school lunch program and the United States department of agriculture foods program may participate in the Washington local food for schools program, but participation is voluntary unless otherwise required by state or federal law.(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington local food for schools program must:(a) Establish a local foods catalog of unprocessed or minimally processed Washington grown items that are appropriate for school meals and aligned with the federal buy American provision and other federal requirements;(b) Offer ordering windows through the existing United States department of agriculture foods system; and(c) Coordinate storage and distribution within the United States department of agriculture foods network to minimize administrative and logistical burdens for school food authorities and vendors.(3) Procurements for the Washington local food for schools program must be made in accordance with chapter 39.26 RCW and applicable federal child nutrition and commodity procurement requirements, including provisions for competitive solicitation, preferences, and small purchase methods.(4) The Washington local food for schools program shall apply geographic or Washington grown preferences, consistent with federal guidance permitting use of "local" as a specification and geographic preference, for unprocessed agricultural products.(5) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) "School food authority" means a school district participating in the national school lunch program under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1751 et seq.;(b) "United States department of agriculture foods" means foods purchased by the United States department of agriculture and provided to eligible school food authorities through the distribution system administered by the office of superintendent of public instruction; and(c) "Washington grown" has the same meaning as in RCW 15.64.060.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate with the Washington state department of agriculture, the department of enterprise services, the department of health, and Washington State University to support the Washington local food for schools program created in section 1 of this act and Washington's farm-to-school initiatives by:(1) Developing uniform procurement procedures, materials, and practical recommendations for school food authorities as defined in section 1 of this act;(2) Providing technical assistance to local vendors regarding contracting, certification, food safety, and distribution requirements; and(3) Improving distribution infrastructure to enable centralized aggregation and delivery of local products across United States department of agriculture child nutrition programs.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.235 RCW to read as follows:(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the Washington local food for schools program created in section 1 of this act, and spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private sources according to their terms.(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall endeavor to leverage available federal funds, including commodity entitlement and cooperative agreements, to supplement and sustain the Washington local food for schools program.Sec. 4. RCW 28A.235.180 and 2025 c 314 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may coordinate with the department of agriculture to promote and facilitate new and existing regional markets programs, including farm-to-school initiatives established in accordance with RCW 15.64.060, ((and)) small farm direct marketing assistance in accordance with RCW 15.64.050, and the Washington local food for schools program created in section 1 of this act. In coordinating with the department of agriculture, the office of the superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to provide technical assistance, including outreach and best practices strategies, to school districts with farm-to-school initiatives.(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the regional markets programs of the department of agriculture must be a centralized connection point for schools and other institutions for accessing and sharing information, tools, ideas, and best practices for purchasing Washington-grown food.(a) In accordance with this subsection (2), program staff from the department of agriculture may provide:(i) Scale-appropriate information and resources to farms to help them respond to the growing demand for local and direct marketed products; and(ii) Targeted technical assistance to farmers, food businesses, and buyers, including schools, about business planning, access to markets, product development, distribution infrastructure, and sourcing, procuring, and promoting Washington-grown foods, including food that might be going to waste.(b) In accordance with this subsection (2), program staff from the department of agriculture may provide technical assistance to:(i) Support new and existing farm businesses;(ii) Maintain the economic viability of farms;(iii) Support compliance with applicable federal, state, and local requirements; and(iv) Support access and preparation efforts for competing in markets that are a good fit for their scale and products, including schools and public institutions, and direct-to-consumer markets that include, but are not limited to, farmers markets, local retailers, restaurants, value-added product developments, and agritourism opportunities.(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the regional markets programs of the department of agriculture may support school districts in establishing or expanding farm-to-school initiatives by providing information and guidance to overcome barriers to purchasing Washington-grown food, including food that might be going to waste. In accordance with this subsection (3), regional markets program activities may include, but are not limited to:(a) Connecting schools and other institutions with farmers and distribution chains;(b) Overcoming seasonality constraints;(c) Providing budgeting assistance;(d) Navigating procurement requirements;(e) Reducing food waste through the purchase of Washington-grown food, consistent with the goals of RCW 70A.205.007 and 70A.205.715; and(f) Developing educational materials that can be used in cafeterias, classrooms, and in other educational environments.(4) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, school districts and other institutions may coordinate with the department of agriculture to promote and facilitate new and existing farm-to-school initiatives. School district representatives involved in these initiatives may include, but are not limited to, school nutrition staff, purchasing staff, student representatives, and parent organizations.(5) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may award grants to school districts to collaborate with community-based organizations, food banks, and farms or gardens for reducing high school dropout occurrences through farm engagement projects. Projects established by school districts that receive grants in accordance with this section must:(a) Primarily target low-income and disengaged youth who have dropped out or who are at risk of dropping out of high school; and(b) Provide participating youth with opportunities for:(i) Performing community service, including, but not limited to, building food gardens for low-income families, and work-based learning and employment during the school year and summer through farm or garden programs;(ii) Earning core and elective credits applied toward high school graduation, including but not limited to, science, health, and career and technical education credits;(iii) Receiving development support and services, including social and emotional learning, counseling, leadership training, and career and college guidance; and(iv) Improving food security for themselves and their community through the project.Sec. 5. RCW 15.64.060 and 2025 c 314 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A farm-to-school program is created within the department to facilitate increased procurement of Washington grown food by schools.(2) The department, in consultation with the department of health, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of enterprise services, and Washington State University, shall, in order of priority:(a) Identify and develop policies and procedures to implement and evaluate the farm-to-school program, including coordinating with school procurement officials, buying cooperatives, and other appropriate organizations to develop uniform procurement procedures and materials, including procedures enabling centralized aggregation and distribution of Washington grown foods through the United States department of agriculture foods distribution system, as defined in section 1 of this act, of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and practical recommendations to facilitate the purchase of Washington grown food by the common schools. These policies, procedures, and recommendations shall be made available to school districts to adopt at their discretion;(b) Assist food producers, distributors, and food brokers to market Washington grown food to schools and participate in state procurement systems and master contracts by informing them of food procurement opportunities, bid procedures, school purchasing criteria, and other requirements;(c) Assist schools in connecting with local producers by informing them of the sources and availability of Washington grown food, including food that might be going to waste including, but not limited to, grade B produce, as allowed by federal regulations and local requirements, as well as the nutritional, environmental, and economic benefits of purchasing Washington grown food;(d) Identify and recommend mechanisms that will increase the predictability of sales for producers and the adequacy of supply for purchasers;(e) Identify and make available existing curricula, programs and publications that educate students on the nutritional, environmental, and economic benefits of preparing and consuming locally grown food;(f) Support efforts to advance other farm-to-school connections such as school gardens or farms and farm visits; and(g) As resources allow, seek additional funds to leverage state expenditures.(3) The department in cooperation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collect data on the activities conducted pursuant to chapter 215, Laws of 2008 and communicate such data biennially to the appropriate committees of the legislature beginning November 15, 2009. Data collected ((may))must include the numbers of schools and farms participating and any increases in the procurement of Washington grown food by the common schools.(4) As used in this section, RCW 28A.335.190, and 28A.235.170, "Washington grown" means grown and packed or processed in Washington.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. This act may be known and cited as the Washington local food for schools act.--- END ---